Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.360

Fraternal or benevolent organizations and labor unions excepted.

This chapter does not apply to any funeral right or benefit issued or granted as an incident to or by reason of membership in any fraternal or benevolent association or cooperative or society, or labor union not organized for profit.

[ 1989 c 390 s 12; 1982 c 66 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Transfer of records, files, and pending business—Savings—1982 c 66: See notes following RCW 18.39.240.